IT
----------
1.
About the job
As a Technical Services Consultant, you will have the opportunity to contribute to our ongoing success by delivering high-quality and timely technical implementation support and services that enable Public Financial Management (PFM) reform initiatives for governments around the world.

During the implementation of the FreeBalance Accountability Suite, you will leverage your technical expertise in ERP implementation to design, develop, implement, test, and deploy the FreeBalance Government Resource Planning (GRP) solution. You will collaborate with multiple stakeholders across banks, other government agencies, and financial institutions to design and implement data exchange mechanisms and integrations between systems.

In this role, you will also serve as a Technical Solution Consultant to the in-country project teams, ensuring effective knowledge transfer and adherence to best practices. Additionally, you will work closely with the Sales and Pre-Sales Teams to provide technical insights for existing and prospective customer projects, assist in preparing responses to RFPs, and act as a subject matter expert during technical analysis and specification phases.



Main responsibilities:

Configure and customize web services based on project and system requirements.
Perform web service integration using SOAP and REST standards between FreeBalance GRP and external systems.
Develop, maintain, and optimize BI reports and dashboards using BIRT, and support similar tools such as Jasper Reports, Crystal Reports, Power BI, Pentaho, or Apache BI Suite.
Design and tune ANSI SQL queries to ensure optimal performance and data accuracy across multiple database platforms.
Understand and work with data structures, including data cubes, dimensions, and fact tables, to ensure accurate and efficient reporting.
Support deployment, configuration, and performance optimization of application servers such as Apache Tomcat.
Monitor system performance, troubleshoot technical issues, and implement corrective actions.
Provide technical guidance, training, and post-implementation support to in-country teams and client stakeholders.
Collaborate with internal teams and client representatives to ensure successful delivery of technical solutions aligned with project timelines and quality standards.
English proficiency is required, and knowledge of other languages in addition to the native language is considered an asset


Required Skills and Experience

Proven experience in ERP implementation and system integration using SOAP/REST APIs.
Hands-on experience with BI and dashboard tools, primarily BIRT, and familiarity with JasperReports,Crystal Reports, Power BI, Pentaho, or Apache BI Suite.
Strong knowledge of ANSI SQL, query optimization, and report performance tuning.
Solid understanding of data modeling concepts, including data cubes, dimensions, and fact tables.
Practical experience with web servers such as Apache Tomcat, including deployment and environment configuration.
Good working knowledge of Linux and Windows operating systems.
Experience in ERP environments and public sector or government projects is a plus.


Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of professional IT experience, including technical consulting, implementation, or ERP support.
Strong analytical, troubleshooting, and communication skills.
Ability to work effectively with multicultural teams and government clients.
Willingness to travel internationally for project delivery and customer support.


We thank all applicants for their interest; however, only those selected for an interview will be contacted. FreeBalance is an inclusive employer dedicated to building a diverse workforce to increase the representation of the designated groups based on each country’s legislation. We encourage applications from all qualified candidates and will accommodate applicants’ needs under the respective labour law throughout all stages of the recruitment process.

----------------


2. 
About the job
Why Aqovia?

At the Intersection of Innovation and Impact, introducing Aqovia. Aqovia is an international technology firm dedicated to creating tangible value through the power of AI, data-driven, and bespoke software solutions and services.

Our unique approach extends beyond traditional service and solutions delivery, we strategically invest in and nurture a diverse portfolio of promising companies operating across vital sectors including; financial services, health, infrastructure management, sustainability, education, and business intelligence.

This commitment to creating innovation across a broad spectrum allows Aqovia to stay at the cutting edge, delivering transformative solutions and creating significant impact. For our clients and strategic partners, Aqovia offers a unique opportunity to be part of a dynamic and forward-thinking group shaping the future

Role Overview

We are seeking a highly experienced Solutions Architect to lead architecture across complex digital transformation and software development programmes. The role spans consultative pre-sales through post-sales delivery and optimisation, covering cloud, application development, integration, APIs, and modern digital platforms.

A core part of this role is the ability to run effective discovery sessions, uncover client pain points, constraints, and blockers, and translate them into multiple viable solution options that balance technical excellence, delivery feasibility, risk, and commercial considerations.

You will act as a trusted advisor, shaping solutions that are technically robust, pragmatic, and aligned to Agile, Scrum, and DevOps delivery models.

Key Responsibilities:

Discovery, Problem Definition & Solution Shaping

Lead structured discovery sessions and workshops to identify business objectives, user needs, technical pain points, risks, and delivery constraints.
Analyse existing systems, processes, and architectures to uncover challenges, blockers, and improvement opportunities.
Develop multiple solution options and architectural approaches, clearly articulating trade-offs, risks, costs, and benefits.
Guide clients toward the most appropriate solution based on outcomes, not just technology choices.

Consultative Pre-Sales & Bid Support

Lead technical discovery for digital and software transformation initiatives.
Define solution architectures that align business objectives with modern software delivery practices.
Support RFP/RFI and tender responses, including solution designs, delivery approaches, and architectural narratives.
Partner with Sales to present solution options and recommendations to senior business and technical stakeholders.

End-to-End Digital & Software Solution Architecture

Own solution architecture across software development and digital platform projects, including:
Custom application development
API-first and integration-led architectures
Data, analytics, and digital services
Cloud and hybrid environments (AWS, Azure, GCP)
Define architectural standards, principles, and reusable patterns.
Produce architecture artefacts such as HLDs, LLDs, roadmaps, and diagrams.
Ensure non-functional requirements (security, performance, scalability, resilience, compliance) are embedded into designs.

Agile, DevOps & Engineering Alignment

Work closely with delivery teams operating in Agile and Scrum frameworks.
Ensure architectural designs support iterative development, continuous delivery, and rapid feedback loops.
Champion DevOps practices, including CI/CD pipelines, infrastructure-as-code, automated testing, and deployment strategies.
Provide architectural governance that enables speed without compromising quality.

Post-Sales Delivery & Client Engagement

Provide architectural leadership throughout delivery and implementation.
Act as a technical authority and escalation point for software development programmes.
Support clients post-delivery with optimisation, scaling, and roadmap evolution.
Build long-term relationships as a trusted digital and technology advisor.

Thought Leadership & Community Engagement

Facilitate architecture and solution design workshops.
Represent the organisation at industry conferences, client events, and forums.
Contribute to internal capability building, knowledge sharing, and best practices.

Skills & Experience:

Essential

Proven experience as a Solutions Architect delivering digital and software development projects.
Strong experience leading discovery sessions and translating complex pain points into actionable architectures.
Demonstrated ability to design multiple solution options and clearly articulate trade-offs.
Strong practical understanding of Agile, Scrum, and modern SDLCs.
Hands-on experience with DevOps practices, including CI/CD pipelines.
Broad technical background across application development, integration, and cloud platforms.
Experience supporting pre-sales activities, RFPs/RFIs, and client-facing engagements.
Excellent communication skills with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.

Desirable

Consultancy or professional services experience.
Experience working across multi-disciplinary Agile teams (engineering, UX, QA, product).
Familiarity with microservices, containerisation, and modern deployment patterns.
Relevant certifications (Cloud, Agile, DevOps, Architecture).


------------

3. 
In this role, you will:

Take ownership of high-stakes projects, ensuring timely and flawless implementation for top-tier banks. 
Work directly with customers, leading end-to-end delivery of AdalFi’s solutions. 
Be part of a collaborative team driving innovation in financial workflows. Play a critical role in optimizing banking operations, customer experiences, and product delivery. 

Key Responsibilities:

Implementation Leadership: Lead all implementation phases, including pre-UAT, UAT, production deployments, and post-go-live support. 
Customer Engagement: Serve as the primary point of contact for customers, managing expectations and ensuring professional communication throughout the project lifecycle. 
UAT Coordination: Plan, execute, and oversee UAT sessions with banks, resolving issues and ensuring readiness for production. 
Issue Resolution: Proactively track and resolve technical and operational issues, escalating when necessary. 
Process Optimization: Identify inefficiencies in workflows and recommend improvements to enhance delivery. 
Collaboration: Work closely with engineering, QA, and product teams to ensure alignment on deliverables and timelines. 
Mentorship: Provide guidance to junior team members, helping them grow and succeed. 

Required Skills & Experience:

Soft Skills:

Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills to manage client relationships effectively. 
Strong leadership abilities to guide projects and teams. 
Exceptional organizational and multitasking skills to manage multiple projects simultaneously. 
A problem-solving mindset with a focus on delivering results. Hard Skills:
Proven experience in implementing software solutions, especially in banking or financial domains. 
Expertise in UAT processes, system testing, and API integrations. 
Proficiency with tools like JIRA, Confluence, or Asana. 
Advanced technical skills, including SQL, debugging, and understanding of system configurations. 

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field from a reputed university. 
2-4 years of experience in implementation, delivery, or project management roles, preferably in the banking or fintech sector.

---------

4.
About the job
We at Inbox Business Technologies, are seeking a Principal Consultant - ITSM/BCMS, who will be responsible for leading IT Service Management consulting engagements and driving end-to-end ITSM implementation projects for clients across various industries. This role involves managing a team of consultants, delivering high-quality ITSM advisory services, and ensuring alignment with ISO 20000 and ITIL best practices. The ideal candidate will bring extensive implementation experience, strong leadership capabilities, and deep expertise in ITSM frameworks and tools. Also, additionally, having a sound knowledge of ISO 22301 BCMS along with DevSecOps experience would be welcomed.

Responsibilities

Lead and manage ITSM implementation and transformation projects, ensuring project delivery within scope, time, and quality expectations
Oversee development and enhancement of ITSM processes aligned with ISO 20000 and ITIL frameworks
Provide strategic guidance to clients on IT service governance, service delivery optimization, and continuous improvement initiatives
Manage and mentor a team of ITSM consultants, enabling skills development and performance excellence
Conduct gap assessments, maturity evaluations, and process design workshops with client stakeholders
Support presales activities including proposal development, solution presentations, and effort estimation
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to ensure seamless integration with IT operations and governance functions
Ensure compliance and maintain documentation throughout the lifecycle of ITSM engagements
Stay updated on industry trends and advancements in ITSM tools (e.g., Jira, ServiceNow, BMC Remedy, Managed Engine etc.), frameworks, and standards

Requirements

Master's or Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, or IT-related field
ITIL Expert/Managing Professional
ISO 20000 Lead Implementer / Lead Auditor
8 - 10 years of experience in ITSM consulting or related roles
In-depth knowledge of ITIL, ISO 20000, and other relevant frameworks/regulations
Practical experience in ISO 20000 implementation
Familiarity with other IT standards/frameworks such as ISO 27001, ISO 22301, DevSecOps and COBIT, NIST, NCA, SAMA would be an added advantage
Excellent leadership, problem-solving, and decision-making skills
Proven ability to manage multiple projects and clients simultaneously
Experience in conducting internal and external audits related to ITSM would be an added advantage
Strong stakeholder engagement, report writing, and project management skills

------------

5.
About the job
Primary skills:Technology->IOT Platform->AWS IOT

A day in the life of an Infoscion

 As part of the Infosys consulting team, your primary role would be to get to the heart of customer issues, diagnose problem areas, design innovative solutions and facilitate deployment resulting in client delight.
 You will develop a proposal by owning parts of the proposal document and by giving inputs in solution design based on areas of expertise.
 You will plan the activities of configuration, configure the product as per the design, conduct conference room pilots and will assist in resolving any queries related to requirements and solution design
 You will conduct solution/product demonstrations, POC/Proof of Technology workshops and prepare effort estimates which suit the customer budgetary requirements and are in line with organization’s financial guidelines
 Actively lead small projects and contribute to unit-level and organizational initiatives with an objective of providing high quality value adding solutions to customers. If you think you fit right in to help our clients navigate their next in their digital transformation journey, this is the place for you!
 Ability to develop value-creating strategies and models that enable clients to innovate, drive growth and increase their business profitability
 Good knowledge on software configuration management systems
 Awareness of latest technologies and Industry trends
 Logical thinking and problem solving skills along with an ability to collaborate
 Understanding of the financial processes for various types of projects and the various pricing models available
 Ability to assess the current processes, identify improvement areas and suggest the technology solutions
 One or two industry domain knowledge
 Client Interfacing skills
 Project and Team management

-----------------

6.
About the job
Requisition Id: 1680852

As a global leader in assurance, tax, transaction and advisory services, we hire and develop the most passionate people in their field to help build a better working world. This starts with a culture that believes in giving you the training, opportunities and creative freedom. At EY, we don't just focus on who you are now, but who you can become. We believe that it’s your career and ‘It’s yours to build’ which means potential here is limitless and we'll provide you with motivating and fulfilling experiences throughout your career to help you on the path to becoming your best professional self.

The opportunity : Senior Consultant-FS-Tech Consulting-CNS - TC - Technology Strategy & Transformation - Hyderabad

FS : 

Finance fuels our lives. Banking, Insurance and Wealth management, create the foundations for growth, prosperity and peace of mind. No other Industry touches so many people or shapes so many lives.

Amid sweeping regulatory change, today’s financial services institutions are focusing on digital transformation, convergence and disruption from an array of nontraditional competitors — all while meeting greater demands for trust and transparency.

To address this delicate balance of issues, our competent team of business strategists, technologists and industry leaders bring fresh thinking and sector knowledge across banking and capital markets, insurance, and wealth and asset management. The results are seamless collaboration, innovative problem solving, breakthrough performance gains and sustainable value creation.

We recruit, train and nurture a diverse set of people who dedicate their minds to building the future of financial services. Together, we explore new perspectives with innovative and entrepreneurial thinking to deliver exceptional client service and ensure that what we do today, counts for tomorrow.

CNS - TC - Technology Strategy & Transformation : 

EY Consulting is building a better working world by transforming businesses through the power of people, technology and innovation. Our client-centric approach focuses on driving long-term value for our clients by solving their most strategic problems. EY Consulting is made up of three sub-service lines: Business Consulting (including Performance Improvement and Risk Consulting), Technology Consulting and People Advisory Services.

In Tech Consulting, we are transforming businesses through the power of people, technology and innovation. It places humans@center, leverages technology@speed and enables innovation@scale.

Your Key Responsibilities

Technical Excellence

Demonstrated ability to analyze and articulate business needs to drive technology strategy in financial services. Proficient in developing transformation roadmaps that align technology initiatives with organizational goals. Experience in leveraging industry best practices to optimize technology processes and improve operational efficiency. Skilled in assessing current systems and recommending innovative technology solutions that enhance service delivery. Strong capability to conduct comprehensive market research and competitive analysis to support technology decision-making.

Skills And Attributes

To qualify for the role you must have

Qualification

Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science

Experience

5+ years experience

What We Look For

People with the ability to work in a collaborative manner to provide services across multiple client departments while following the commercial and legal requirements. You will need a practical approach to solving issues and complex problems with the ability to deliver insightful and practical solutions. We look for people who are agile, curious, mindful, and able to sustain positive energy, while being adaptable and creative in their approach.

-----------------------------

7.The opportunity : Associate Consultant-AMI-Tech Consulting-CNS - TC - Cyber Security - Kolkata

AMI : 

The Advanced Manufacturing, Mobility & Infrastructure (AMI) Industry Market contains the following industries: Aerospace and Defence, Chemicals, Infrastructure, Industrial Products, Automotive, and Transportation that includes Mobility-as-a-Service. We help our clients to address the rapidly changing needs of our business world on not only how goods and services are bought and sold, but also on how they are designed and created. AMI builds and shares resources across sectors facing common challenges and aims to drive more effective cross-sector collaboration while enabling greater resource-pooling and developing more cohesive market responses. AMI also presents an opportunity to connect regional sector communities with a more robust, global priority sector infrastructure.

CNS - TC - Cyber Security : 

EY Consulting is building a better working world by transforming businesses through the power of people, technology and innovation. Our client-centric approach focuses on driving long-term value for our clients by solving their most strategic problems. EY Consulting is made up of three sub-service lines: Business Consulting (including Performance Improvement and Risk Consulting), Technology Consulting and People Advisory Services.

In Tech Consulting, we are transforming businesses through the power of people, technology and innovation. It places humans@center, leverages technology@speed and enables innovation@scale.

Your Key Responsibilities

Technical Excellence

Proficient in assessing and analyzing cybersecurity risks to develop mitigation strategies. Experienced in implementing security frameworks and compliance standards relevant to industry best practices. Skilled in conducting vulnerability assessments and penetration testing to identify potential security weaknesses. Knowledgeable in cybersecurity incident response protocols and the ability to develop effective response plans. Ability to collaborate with technical teams to ensure security measures align with overall IT infrastructure and strategy.

Skills And Attributes

To qualify for the role you must have

Qualification

Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science
Bachelor of Computer Applications

Experience

Data Analysis (2+ years)
Technical Writing (2+ years)

What We Look For

People with the ability to work in a collaborative manner to provide services across multiple client departments while following the commercial and legal requirements. You will need a practical approach to solving issues and complex problems with the ability to deliver insightful and practical solutions. We look for people who are agile, curious, mindful, and able to sustain positive energy, while being adaptable and creative in their approach.

What We Offer

Fuelled by the brilliance of our people, EY has emerged as the strongest brand and the most attractive employer in our field, with market-leading growth over competitors. Our people work side-by-side with market-leading entrepreneurs, game-changers, disruptors, and visionaries. As an organization, we are investing more time, technology, and money than ever before in skills and learning for our people. At EY, you will have a personalized Career Journey and also the chance to tap into the resources of our career frameworks to better know about your roles, skills, and opportunities.

EY is equally committed to being an inclusive employer, and we strive to achieve the right balance for our people—enabling us to deliver excellent client service while allowing our people to build their careers as well as focus on their wellbeing.

If you can confidently demonstrate that you meet the criteria above, please contact us as soon as possible.

------------
8.
About Workato

Workato transforms technology complexity into business opportunity. As the leader in enterprise orchestration, Workato helps businesses globally streamline operations by connecting data, processes, applications, and experiences. Its AI-powered platform enables teams to navigate complex workflows in real-time, driving efficiency and agility.

Trusted by a community of 400,000 global customers, Workato empowers organizations of every size to unlock new value and lead in today’s fast-changing world. Learn how Workato helps businesses of all sizes achieve more at workato.com.

Why join us?

Ultimately, Workato believes in fostering a flexible, trust-oriented culture that empowers everyone to take full ownership of their roles. We are driven by innovation and looking for team players who want to actively build our company.

But, we also believe in balancing productivity with self-care. That’s why we offer all of our employees a vibrant and dynamic work environment along with a multitude of benefits they can enjoy inside and outside of their work lives.

If this sounds right up your alley, please submit an application. We look forward to getting to know you!

Also, Feel Free To Check Out Why

Business Insider named us an “enterprise startup to bet your career on” 
Forbes’ Cloud 100 recognized us as one of the top 100 private cloud companies in the world 
Deloitte Tech Fast 500 ranked us as the 17th fastest growing tech company in the Bay Area, and 96th in North America 
Quartz ranked us the #1 best company for remote workers 

This role requires working during EMEA working hours (1:30pm-10:30pm IST)

Responsibilities

We are looking for an exceptional Technical Consultant to join our growing team. In this role, you will be responsible for enabling our clients to become proficient on the Workato Platform, empowering their employees and building solutions for their businesses. You will also be responsible to:

Work across multiple customer-facing teams (Sales, Business Development, Product, Engineering, Customer Success) to improve the product's vision and to make global businesses and organizations successful. 
Technical solutions expert with an aptitude for technical advising, troubleshooting, and analysis. With strong communication skills, you will be proficient in communicating technically complex ideas to a non-technical audience. You help Workato employees and customers approach and resolve technical problems and design scalable services. 
Gather requirements via client meetings and lead the solution design process jointly with customers, Business Development and Engineering 
Develop capabilities and features based on customer requirements as well as to extend Workato connector capabilities via HTTP and SDK 
Work closely with Product and Engineering to review customer requirements and feedback, and identify opportunities for Workato platform enhancements 
Accelerate development for roadmap features to address specific customer requirements 
Improve internal processes, and promote knowledge sharing in the team, by contributing to Workato’s knowledge base 
Prioritize and deliver outstanding customer service experience to Workato customers 

Requirements

Qualifications / Experience / Technical Skills

Background in information systems, computing, engineering or equivalent industry experience preferred 
Have 2-4 years of experience in similar role 
Technical background or a good understanding of technology and industry trends, especially in the app integration space 
Working knowledge of APIs (RESTful, etc.) 
Working knowledge of Data Structure (JSON, XML, etc.) 
Working knowledge of any RDBMS 
Previous coding experience/development background required 
Experience working with cloud business apps like Workday / SAP / NetSuite / Salesforce / ServiceNow / Marketo is a plus 

Soft Skills / Personal Characteristics

Strong collaboration skills, ability to adapt to a dynamic start-up environment with a passion for making an impact 
Customer-oriented mindset, easily adaptable to different company sizes and line of business 
Excellent enablement skills, experienced in establishing trust and building partnerships with customers or partners 
Strong critical thinking, analytical skills with an entrepreneurial and proactive mind-set 
Ability to effectively prioritize tasks and manage time, even under high-pressure situations 
Strong written and oral communication skills in English, with the ability to convey complex technical concepts effectively to a non-technical audience 
Fast learner who can independently conduct extensive research, and synthesize ideas, information and options quickly 
Be proactive about solving problems and be ready to take on additional initiatives and responsibilities as they emerge 


-------------

9.
Interact with new or existing clients and trading partners to capture and analyze requirements, mapping specifications, project objectives and on-boarding activities through go-live;
Gather assigned clients’ data, execute implementation guidelines and requirements within the allocated timeframe, while providing appropriate status updates to the client(s);
Develop and setup project plans, while maintain project documentation and providing time/effort estimates throughout implementation;
Setup communications for EDI transmissions – including but not limited to: AS2, FTP and VAN setups;
Mapping documents to and from various formats including but not limited to ANSI X12, XML, and flat file layouts utilizing ODBC connectivity;
Provide on-going training and technical support to clients, while evaluating impact and analysis for future improvements;
Troubleshoot and coordinate efficient resolutions and evaluation to errors and issues found internally, or by the client;
Effectively build on current support and services by enhancing the performance of the client services organization;
Perform additional responsibilities as assigned, or when current responsibilities are changed with or without notice.

What You’ll Need To Succeed

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Programming preferred or equivalent year of experience
Minimum 2 years professional experience in project management or an implementation role
Minimum 2 years professional experience working with external clients in a customer support team environment
EDI, ERP implementation, or integration experience a plus
EDI industry knowledge and understanding preferred
Knowledge of various file transfer protocols: AS2, FTP and VAN
Knowledge of various EDI standards: ANSI X12 EDI, a plus

What You Will Likely Bring

Team player with the ability to work independently
Strong, clear and professional communication skills, both written and verbal
Ability to write technical and operational process documentation, as needed
Ability to learn technology quickly through instruction, collaboration and self-learning
Excellent multi-tasking skills requires to carry out multiple client projects at one time
Highly collaborative approach with team members, management, and colleagues; must be an active and participative team member committed to the success of the entire team and not just individual goals
Uses analytical and effective problem solving and decision making to reach an appropriate resolution 
Excellent interpersonal skills in one-on-one situations and groups with all levels of both the internal and customer organizations
Operational Excellence: Consistently execute on projects, tasks, and other deliverables in an efficient manner; remove, reduce, or effectively navigate processes to prevent unnecessary delays; continuously focus on improving business processes; use data and facts to guide decision making.
Strategic Thinking: demonstrate awareness of the impact of own work on aspects of the Company's strategy and the impact of the Company's strategy on own work; identifies implications of own analysis.
Change Leadership/Agility: Adapt appropriately to changing conditions; seek innovative ways to change and improve; provide consistent and calm leadership during times of turbulent or unexpected change; help team members understand perspective and reason changes are necessary.
Resilience: Continuing to perform effectively when faced with time pressures, adversity, disappointment, or opposition. Remain focused, composed, and optimistic in difficult situations and bounces back from failures or disappointments.

Good To Have

Ability to work effectively for 40+ hours per week (including sitting, standing and working on a computer for extended periods of time).
Ability to communicate effectively in a collaborative work environment utilizing various technologies such as: telephone, computer, web, voice, teleconferencing, e-mail, etc.

Position Type, Expected Location and Hours of Work:

This is a full-time remote position and hours of work are generally Monday through Friday. This position may require additional hours outside of the standard work schedule. Responsibilities occasionally may require overtime, holiday, evening and/or weekend hours in order to meet deadlines or to accommodate clients. This is an on call aspect to this position although limited in its schedule.


-----------

10.
Project Role : Technology Consulting Practitioner

Project Role Description : Advises, leads and works on high impact activities within the systems development lifecycle, and provides advisory work for the IT function itself.

Must have skills : Oracle HCM Recruiting Cloud

Good to have skills : NA

Minimum 2 Year(s) Of Experience Is Required

Educational Qualification : 15 years full time education

Summary: As a Technology Consulting Practitioner, you will engage in a variety of high-impact activities that are crucial to the systems development lifecycle. Your typical day will involve advising and leading teams, collaborating with stakeholders, and ensuring that the IT function aligns with organizational goals. You will be instrumental in driving projects forward, providing insights and solutions that enhance operational efficiency and effectiveness. Roles & Responsibilities: - Expected to perform independently and become an SME. - Required active participation/contribution in team discussions. - Contribute in providing solutions to work related problems. - Facilitate workshops and meetings to gather requirements and feedback from stakeholders. - Develop and present comprehensive reports on project progress and outcomes. Professional & Technical Skills: - Must To Have Skills: Proficiency in Oracle HCM Recruiting Cloud. - Experience with cloud-based HR solutions and their implementation. - Strong analytical skills to assess and improve system functionalities. - Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders. - Familiarity with project management methodologies and tools. Additional Information: - The candidate should have minimum 2 years of experience in Oracle HCM Recruiting Cloud. - This position is based at our Kolkata office. - A 15 years full time education is required.

------------


11. 
Role Overview 



As a Presales Consultant at Keka HR, you will be the technical and domain expert during the sales cycle. You will engage with prospective customers, understand their HR / people‑ops challenges, map those to Keka’s product/features, conduct demos or proofs of concept, and enable the sales team to close deals. You’ll act as a bridge between Product, Sales, and Customers, ensuring the proposed solutions are feasible, scalable, and aligned with customer needs. 



Location - Delhi, NCR, Gurgaon, Pune, Ahmedabad, Surat, Mumbai 



Key Responsibilities 

Conduct discovery sessions / workshops with prospects to understand their HR systems, process workflows, technology environment, business needs, and pain points. 
Map prospect requirements to Keka’s product modules / marketplace / integration capabilities / APIs & propose tailored solutions. 
Deliver product demonstrations, proof‑of‑concepts (POCs), and custom demos that illustrate how Keka can solve customer problems. 
Support the sales team in responding to RFIs, RFPs, and other technical proposal requests. 
Create technical proposals, statements of work (SoWs), and commercial documentation as needed. 
Clarify non‑functional requirements: infrastructure, security, compliance, data migration, integrations, etc. 
Liaise with Product and Engineering teams to gather inputs, clarify feature gaps, and feedback customer requirements. 
Maintain knowledge of industry trends, competitive landscape in HR tech / HRMS / SaaS, best practices, to position product differentiators effectively. 
Communicate value propositions clearly to both technical and non‑technical stakeholders (HR leaders, Finance, IT, etc.). 
Track leads / presales pipeline, ensure documentation is updated in CRM or internal tools. 
Occasionally assist in post‑sales handover to ensure smooth transition from presales to implementation. 
Skills & Qualifications 

Bachelor’s degree in engineering, Computer Science, Information Systems, or equivalent technical / business degree. 
3‑6 years of experience in pre‑sales / solution consulting / technical sales roles, ideally within SaaS / HRMS / HR technology domain. 
Strong understanding of APIs, integrations, data flows, security & compliance requirements. 
Excellent communication, storytelling, and presentation skills; ability to deliver product demos convincingly. 
Able to explain complex technical or HR systems in simple business value terms. 
Customer‑facing experience; stakeholder management skills. 
Analytical mindset; ability to think through both functionality & technical constraints. 
Ability to multi‑task, work under deadlines, respond to RFPs etc. 
Prior experience working cross‑functionally with Product / Engineering / Sales teams. 


Preferred / Nice‑to‑Have 

Experience with HRMS / HR tech platforms, marketplace/integration ecosystems. 
Prior exposure to enterprise customers (medium to large) with complex HR landscapes. 
Knowledge of data regulations/privacy (for example, GDPR / local data protection laws). 
Experience with technical demos, POCs. 
Certifications relevant to SaaS / integrations / cloud infrastructure. 


What Success Looks Like 

Conversion rate of presales engagements → closed deals. 
Reduction in sales cycle time by providing clear & early clarifications during presales. 
Quality and timeliness of responses to RFIs/RFPs. 
High stakeholder / customer satisfaction during presales. 
Effective knowledge sharing: capturing recurring requirements, feature‑gap feedback to product. 


---------

12. 
Job Description & Summary
A career within PwC's Oracle Services Practice, will provide you with the opportunity to help organizations use enterprise technology to achieve their digital technology goals and capitalize on business opportunities. We help our clients implement and effectively use Oracle offerings to solve their business problems and fuel success in the areas of finance operations, human capital management, supply chain management, reporting and analytics, and governance, risk and compliance.


To really stand out and make us fit for the future in a constantly changing world, each and every one of us at PwC needs to be a purpose-led and values-driven leader at every level. To help us achieve this we have the PwC Professional; our global leadership development framework. It gives us a single set of expectations across our lines, geographies and career paths, and provides transparency on the skills we need as individuals to be successful and progress in our careers, now and in the future.

As a Manager, you'll work as part of a team of problem solvers, helping to solve complex business issues from strategy to execution. PwC Professional skills and responsibilities for this management level include but are not limited to:


Develop new skills outside of comfort zone.
Act to resolve issues which prevent the team working effectively.
Coach others, recognise their strengths, and encourage them to take ownership of their personal development.
Analyse complex ideas or proposals and build a range of meaningful recommendations.
Use multiple sources of information including broader stakeholder views to develop solutions and recommendations.
Address sub-standard work or work that does not meet firm's/client's expectations.
Use data and insights to inform conclusions and support decision-making.
Develop a point of view on key global trends, and how they impact clients.
Manage a variety of viewpoints to build consensus and create positive outcomes for all parties.
Simplify complex messages, highlighting and summarising key points.
Uphold the firm's code of ethics and business conduct.

_--------------------
13 .
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:




Deliver consulting services to install, configure, and integrate ServiceNow products based on defined requirements
Develop custom software solutions using scripting and development tools within the ServiceNow platform
Prepare and maintain technical documentation as required by customer contracts and internal processes
Conduct value-based assessments and workshops to help customers maximize their ServiceNow investment
Build and maintain custom configurations including business rules, client scripts, script includes, UI policies, ACLs, data policies, and UI scripts
Troubleshoot configuration and scripting issues to ensure smooth platform functionality
Participate in requirements review and validation sessions to ensure technical alignment with business needs
Attend and contribute to scrum ceremonies
Deliver work on time and with quality, contributing to positive customer experiences and feedback
Continue learning service delivery solutions, technologies, and methodologies
Maintain professionalism and an uninterrupted work environment during all client meetings and interactions
Demonstrate strong corporate citizenship by completing required administrative tasks such as timesheets, feedback forms, and internal documentation accurately and on time




About the Role





ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS:




Contribute to continuous improvement initiatives across the organization, supporting development of best practices and delivery methodologies
Contribute to internal knowledge growth by participating in Centers of Excellence (COE’s), presenting knowledge sharing sessions, and Share the Wealth (STW)




Responsibilities





2+ years developing technical solutions and administering ServiceNow
2+ years professional consulting




Qualifications





CERTIFICATIONS/EDUCATION:




Must have CSA and minimum of 1 CIS certificates across platform.




Required Skills





Self-motivated and accountable, with the ability to take initiative, manage competing priorities, and deliver results independently
Organized and solution-oriented, with strong time management skills and a proactive approach to problem-solving
Clear and confident communicator with strong proficiency in English—verbal, written, and presentation—with the ability to convey information effectively to both technical and nontechnical audiences
Collaborative and open to feedback, with a strong ability to build relationships and work cross-functionally
Skilled in conflict mediation, with the ability to navigate sensitive situations with professionalism, empathy, and sound judgment
Customer- and stakeholder-focused, with a consultative mindset and the ability to build trust and understand evolving needs
Detail-oriented and analytical, with strong troubleshooting skills and a commitment to accuracy and follow-through
Adaptable and composed in dynamic environments, consistently demonstrating integrity and balanced decision-making



------------

14.
About the job
Drive end-to-end cloud transformation for enterprise clients—from initial application assessment through migration execution and post-migration optimization. You'll work directly with customer teams to evaluate on-premises workloads, design migration strategies, and deliver production-ready cloud solutions across AWS, Azure, and GCP.

Conduct technical discovery and application assessments to determine cloud readiness, dependencies, and migration complexity

Design and architect migration pathways for workloads moving from on-premises data centers to cloud—covering lift-and-shift, re-platforming, and re-architecture patterns

Lead cloud assessment engagements using native discovery tools and build business cases with TCO analysis and migration roadmaps

Hands-on migration execution using platform-native migration services and third-party tools for servers, databases, and storage

Work with customers on hybrid connectivity design—dedicated interconnects, site-to-site VPN, and transit architectures for on-prem integration

Build cloud landing zones with proper governance, security baselines, identity management, and network segmentation across multi-account/subscription environments

Collaborate with application teams to refactor legacy workloads for cloud-native architectures (containers, serverless, managed services)

Document migration runbooks, cutover plans, and rollback procedures for production transitions

Provide post-migration support—cost optimization, performance tuning, and operational handoff to customer teams

Responsibility :

Assessment & Discovery:
Conduct technical discovery workshops with client teams to understand current infrastructure, applications, and dependencies
Perform application portfolio assessments to evaluate cloud readiness, migration complexity, and modernization opportunities
Deploy and configure discovery tools to map application dependencies, performance baselines, and resource utilization
Analyze assessment data to categorize workloads using migration strategies (rehost, re-platform, refactor, retire, retain)
Build TCO models and business cases to justify cloud migration investments


Migration Planning & Design:

Design target cloud architectures based on client requirements, compliance needs, and performance objectives
Develop migration roadmaps with phased approaches, timelines, and resource estimates
Create landing zone designs with multi-account/subscription structures, network topology, and security baselines
Design hybrid connectivity solutions for on-premises integration during and post-migration
Document migration patterns, cutover plans, and rollback procedures for each workload wave


Hands-On Migration Execution:

Execute server, database, and storage migrations using cloud-native and third-party migration tools
Configure replication, perform testing, and validate migrated workloads in target environments
Lead cutover activities during maintenance windows, coordinating with application and infrastructure teams
Troubleshoot migration issues in real-time and implement fixes to keep projects on track
Perform post-migration validation: application functionality, performance benchmarking, and security posture verification


Architecture & Infrastructure Delivery:

Build and deploy cloud infrastructure using IaC tools (Terraform, CloudFormation, etc.)
Implement network connectivity: VPNs, dedicated interconnects, transit gateways, and DNS integration
Configure security controls: IAM policies, encryption, logging, monitoring, and compliance frameworks
Set up backup, disaster recovery, and high availability solutions for migrated workloads
Establish CI/CD pipelines for repeatable infrastructure deployments


Modernization & Optimization:

Identify opportunities to modernize applications during migration (containerization, serverless, managed services)
Work with development teams to refactor legacy applications for cloud-native patterns
Implement cost optimization strategies: rightsizing, reserved capacity, autoscaling, and storage tiering
Optimize performance through caching, CDN integration, and database tuning
Establish monitoring, alerting, and operational dashboards for migrated environments


Client Engagement & Knowledge Transfer:

Act as primary technical point of contact for client stakeholders throughout the project lifecycle
Present architecture designs, migration plans, and progress updates to technical and executive audiences
Facilitate workshops on cloud best practices, security, and operational excellence
Create documentation: architecture diagrams, standard operating procedures, and operational runbooks
Deliver knowledge transfer sessions to upskill client teams for ongoing cloud operations


Collaboration & Governance:

Collaborate with project managers to track deliverables, timelines, and risks
Work with security and compliance teams to meet regulatory requirements and internal policies
Coordinate with vendors and third-party teams for integration and migration tooling
Participate in design reviews and provide technical guidance to junior team members
Stay current with cloud platform updates, migration tools, and industry best practices


Post-Migration Support:

Provide hypercare support during stabilization period following production cutovers
Address post-migration issues, performance bottlenecks, and optimization opportunities
Conduct post-implementation reviews to capture lessons learned and improvement areas
Hand off operational responsibilities to client teams or managed services providers with proper documentation


We may use artificial intelligence (AI) tools to support parts of the hiring process, such as reviewing applications, analyzing resumes, or assessing responses. These tools assist our recruitment team but do not replace human judgment. Final hiring decisions are ultimately made by humans. If you would like more information about how your data is processed, please contact us.


---------------
15.

Job Role: Technical Consultant 

Location: Remote

About HSO

HSO are a leading Microsoft Dynamics Gold partner who were founded in 1987 specializing in sectors such as Retail, Rental, Manufacturing, Professional Services and Local Government. With a head count of over 300+ employees in India, winning multiple awards such as 2020 Microsoft Partner of the Year, Best Tech company 2021 and Top 3 Large Companies to work for 2021, our reputation in the Dynamics Market is higher than ever. Prioritizing customer satisfaction, our expertise and pragmatic approach to each customer’s business needs enable us to provide a 100% reference-able solution, supported by award-winning 24-hour support. Our recruitment moto has always been – ‘We don’t want good people to just join us, we want them to stay with us’. Ensuring our employees are challenged, supported, and engaged in our wider family is key to our continued success – we have a designated Learning and Development Team who are continuously offering the best training on the market, combined with an Engagement Team who are creative in ways we can have social activities virtually.

Key Responsibilities

As a Medior Dynamics 365 CE Consultant, you will oversee your own career and personal development with the support of our organization. Just in a few months’ time you will be preparing to step into the exciting world of business consultancy and business processes, supported by the newest Microsoft solutions.

Deliver and implement Dynamics 365 CE solutions of Sales, Customer Service, Field Service, Marketing and Project Operations.
Deliver high quality business and software application services to clients.
The creation of high quality and sustainable client solutions.
Good technical background in Dynamics 365 CE Customization & Configuration and Power Platform.
Skilled in Plugins, Custom API, JavaScript/Typescript, Power Automate and Power Apps for Dynamics 365 CE to extend and enhance core functionalities.
Understanding of Dataverse security roles, field-level security, and environment governance
Good to have: Design and extend model-driven apps, with exposure to canvas apps where required.
Good to have experience in Third-party Integration and Azure Integrations (Azure Functions, Azure Logic Apps, Azure Service Bus) and Portals.
Good to have experience in configuring build and release pipelines using YAML in Azure DevOps.
Experience with version control systems like GIT, build automation, and release management using Azure DevOps.
Enforce best practices for coding standards, ensuring high-quality, maintainable, and efficient code.
Analyze and troubleshoot complex issues, providing effective and timely solutions.
Conduct code reviews to provide constructive feedback and mentor junior developers.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to identify and resolve challenges in the development process.
Meet customer expectations of business knowledge, skills and behavior.
Communicate progress updates to relevant parties both formally and informally.
Always represent HSO in a professional and positive manner.
Advise customers on industries best practices in a proactive rather than passive way. 

Certifications

PL-900 : Microsoft Certified: Power Platform Fundamentals
PL-200: Microsoft Power Platform Functional Consultant 

Good To Have

PL_400 : Power Platform Developer Associate
PL-600: Microsoft Power Platform Solution Architect 

Qualifications and Skills: 

Bachelor’s degree 
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Minimum 3 to 5 years of proven hands-on experience in CE Configuration, customization, standard workflows, Power Automate Flows, Dashboards, Model Driven App, Fetch XML, forms and views is a must.
Good communication skills and you are creative in solving problems.
Strong analytical skills and you are proactive.
Customer-oriented, not afraid of taking responsibility and able to work independently with less supervision. 


----------

16.
About the job
Project Role : Technology Consulting Practitioner

Project Role Description : Advises, leads and works on high impact activities within the systems development lifecycle, and provides advisory work for the IT function itself.

Must have skills : Oracle HCM Recruiting Cloud

Good to have skills : NA

Minimum 2 Year(s) Of Experience Is Required

Educational Qualification : 15 years full time education

Summary: As a Technology Consulting Practitioner, you will engage in a variety of high-impact activities that are crucial to the systems development lifecycle. Your typical day will involve advising and leading teams, collaborating with stakeholders, and ensuring that the IT function aligns with organizational goals. You will be instrumental in driving projects forward, providing insights and solutions that enhance operational efficiency and effectiveness. Roles & Responsibilities: - Expected to perform independently and become an SME. - Required active participation/contribution in team discussions. - Contribute in providing solutions to work related problems. - Facilitate workshops and meetings to gather requirements and feedback from stakeholders. - Develop and present comprehensive reports on project progress and outcomes. Professional & Technical Skills: - Must To Have Skills: Proficiency in Oracle HCM Recruiting Cloud. - Experience with cloud-based HR solutions and their implementation. - Strong analytical skills to assess and improve system functionalities. - Ability to communicate effectively with both technical and non-technical stakeholders. - Familiarity with project management methodologies and tools. Additional Information: - The candidate should have minimum 2 years of experience in Oracle HCM Recruiting Cloud. - This position is based at our Kolkata office. - A 15 years full time education is required.

-----------

17.
Job description
Platform Optimization Development:
Assess and analyze the current state of the ad exchange platform, identifying areas for improvement in performance, scalability, and reliability.
Provide technical guidance on the architecture, design, and development of the ad exchange platform, including DSP and SSP integrations.
Collaborate with the development team to optimize bid request processing, response handling, and real-time data synchronization.
Strategic Development of SSP and DSP:
Work closely with the leadership team to define the technical strategy and roadmap for the development of SSP and DSP functionalities within our ad exchange platform.
Recommend and implement new technologies, tools, and frameworks that will be critical in building robust and scalable SSP and DSP solutions.
Guide the integration and customization of DSPs and SSPs, ensuring they meet the evolving needs of our clients and partners.
Technical Strategy Roadmap:
Define and drive the technical strategy for the ad exchange platform, aligning with our long-term goal of creating a full-fledged SSP and DSP.
Keep abreast of industry trends, ensuring our platform remains competitive and innovative in the programmatic advertising space.
Integration Customization:
Guide the integration of new DSPs, SSPs, and third-party tools into the ad exchange, ensuring seamless data flow and compatibility.
Customize platform features to meet specific client needs, including implementing advanced targeting, filtering, and reporting functionalities.
Data Analysis Reporting:
Develop and optimize SQL queries, data pipelines, and reporting mechanisms to track key performance metrics, including fill rates, eCPM, response rates, and error rates.
Assist in building dashboards using tools like Looker Studio to visualize and analyze performance data.
Compliance Security:
Ensure the ad exchange platform adheres to industry standards, data privacy regulations, and security best practices.
Conduct regular audits and performance testing to identify and resolve vulnerabilities.
Training Documentation:
Provide training and support to internal teams on platform usage, new features, and best practices.
Create detailed technical documentation for platform architecture, integration processes, and troubleshooting guides.
Qualifications:
Bachelor s or Master s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
5+ years of experience in technical consulting, software development, or a related role, with a focus on ad tech or programmatic advertising.
Strong knowledge of ad exchange platforms, RTB protocols (oRTB), VAST, and digital advertising technologies.
Proficiency in SQL and experience with analytical databases (e.g., ClickHouse, BigQuery).
Familiarity with DSP/SSP integration, API development, and cloud-based infrastructure.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker Studio, Tableau, or Power BI.
Excellent problem-solving skills, with the ability to troubleshoot complex technical issues.
Strong communication skills, with the ability to explain technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with mobile advertising, in-app monetization, and programmatic trading.
Knowledge of data privacy regulations (e.g., GDPR, CCPA) and industry standards (e.g., IAB).
Experience with cloud platforms (AWS, GCP) and containerization technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Familiarity with modern programming languages (Python, Go, Java) and frameworks.
Role: Technical Lead
Industry Type: Events / Live Entertainment
Department: Engineering - Software & QA
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Software Development
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Computer scienceData analysisPDFAnalyticalConsultingPerformance testingTroubleshootingSQLPythonTechnical documentation

-------------

18.
Job description
Platform Optimization Development:
Assess and analyze the current state of the ad exchange platform, identifying areas for improvement in performance, scalability, and reliability.
Provide technical guidance on the architecture, design, and development of the ad exchange platform, including DSP and SSP integrations.
Collaborate with the development team to optimize bid request processing, response handling, and real-time data synchronization.
Strategic Development of SSP and DSP:
Work closely with the leadership team to define the technical strategy and roadmap for the development of SSP and DSP functionalities within our ad exchange platform.
Recommend and implement new technologies, tools, and frameworks that will be critical in building robust and scalable SSP and DSP solutions.
Guide the integration and customization of DSPs and SSPs, ensuring they meet the evolving needs of our clients and partners.
Technical Strategy Roadmap:
Define and drive the technical strategy for the ad exchange platform, aligning with our long-term goal of creating a full-fledged SSP and DSP.
Keep abreast of industry trends, ensuring our platform remains competitive and innovative in the programmatic advertising space.
Integration Customization:
Guide the integration of new DSPs, SSPs, and third-party tools into the ad exchange, ensuring seamless data flow and compatibility.
Customize platform features to meet specific client needs, including implementing advanced targeting, filtering, and reporting functionalities.
Data Analysis Reporting:
Develop and optimize SQL queries, data pipelines, and reporting mechanisms to track key performance metrics, including fill rates, eCPM, response rates, and error rates.
Assist in building dashboards using tools like Looker Studio to visualize and analyze performance data.
Compliance Security:
Ensure the ad exchange platform adheres to industry standards, data privacy regulations, and security best practices.
Conduct regular audits and performance testing to identify and resolve vulnerabilities.
Training Documentation:
Provide training and support to internal teams on platform usage, new features, and best practices.
Create detailed technical documentation for platform architecture, integration processes, and troubleshooting guides.
Qualifications:
Bachelor s or Master s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field.
5+ years of experience in technical consulting, software development, or a related role, with a focus on ad tech or programmatic advertising.
Strong knowledge of ad exchange platforms, RTB protocols (oRTB), VAST, and digital advertising technologies.
Proficiency in SQL and experience with analytical databases (e.g., ClickHouse, BigQuery).
Familiarity with DSP/SSP integration, API development, and cloud-based infrastructure.
Experience with data visualization tools like Looker Studio, Tableau, or Power BI.
Excellent problem-solving skills, with the ability to troubleshoot complex technical issues.
Strong communication skills, with the ability to explain technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders.
Preferred Skills:
Experience with mobile advertising, in-app monetization, and programmatic trading.
Knowledge of data privacy regulations (e.g., GDPR, CCPA) and industry standards (e.g., IAB).
Experience with cloud platforms (AWS, GCP) and containerization technologies (Docker, Kubernetes).
Familiarity with modern programming languages (Python, Go, Java) and frameworks.
Role: Technical Lead
Industry Type: Events / Live Entertainment
Department: Engineering - Software & QA
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Software Development
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Computer scienceData analysisPDFAnalyticalConsultingPerformance testingTroubleshootingSQLPythonTechnical documentation
-----------


19.
Job description
Key Responsibilities :

SAP IS-U Module Expertise :

- Provide technical support for SAP IS-U (Industry-Specific Utilities) modules including Billing, FICA (Financial Contract Accounting), Device Management, and Customer Service.

- Ensure seamless integration and custom development in the SAP IS-U landscape.

Development of Custom Solutions :

- Develop and implement custom enhancements using ABAP (Advanced Business Application Programming) for specific business processes in billing, metering, contract accounts, and customer service.

- Create user exits, BADIs (Business Add-Ins), enhancements, and custom reports to meet project-specific requirements.

Technical Design and Specifications :

- Collaborate with functional teams to convert business requirements into technical specifications.

- Create detailed technical design documents for new developments and enhancements.

- Design and build custom interfaces for integrating SAP IS-U with third-party systems and applications.

Billing and Invoicing Support :

- Provide technical support for SAP IS-U billing processes, including complex billing schemas, billing enhancements, and invoicing.

- Work on custom solutions for bill print, invoice formatting, and output determination.

FICA Custom Development :

- Support custom developments in FICA (Financial Contract Accounting), including payment processing, dunning, and reconciliation processes.

- Configure and customize financial accounting processes such as installment plans, security deposits, and interest calculations.

Data Migration and Conversion :

- Lead data migration activities for master data and transactional data in SAP IS-U, ensuring data accuracy and integrity.

- Use LSMW (Legacy System Migration Workbench) or custom ABAP programs to transfer data from legacy systems.

Performance Tuning and Optimization :

- Analyze and optimize the performance of SAP IS-U programs and reports, ensuring efficient system performance.

- Perform SQL tuning, ABAP optimization, and database indexing for better system response times.

Integration with Other Systems :

- Develop and maintain interfaces using IDocs, RFCs, BAPIs, Web Services, and third-party integrations for seamless data flow between SAP IS-U and external systems.

- Ensure proper data exchange between SAP IS-U, CRM, FI-CA, billing, and other systems.

Issue Resolution and Troubleshooting :

- Provide support for complex SAP IS-U technical issues by identifying root causes, resolving bugs, and troubleshooting system errors.

- Perform ABAP debugging and analysis of technical problems in SAP IS-U applications.

Upgrades and Support Packs :

- Participate in SAP IS-U upgrades, including testing and validation of custom objects, programs, and reports.

- Ensure compatibility and performance of custom developments after system upgrades or support pack implementations.

Testing and Quality Assurance :

- Lead or participate in unit testing, integration testing, and user acceptance testing (UAT) for custom developments and system changes.

- Create and maintain test scripts to validate system performance and ensure adherence to business requirements.

Technical Knowledge and Skills Required :

- Extensive knowledge of SAP IS-U (Industry-Specific Utilities) technical components, including Billing, FICA, Device Management, and Customer Service.

- Strong proficiency in ABAP and ABAP for IS-U to develop custom solutions, reports, enhancements, and interfaces.

- Experience with data migration and conversion tools such as LSMW, BDC, and custom ABAP programs.

- In-depth understanding of IS-U data structures and table relationships.

- Knowledge of interfaces, including IDoc, BAPI, RFC, and Web Services for integrating SAP IS-U with other systems.

- Strong skills in SQL tuning, performance optimization, and database indexing for large-scale utilities systems.

- Familiarity with SAP NetWeaver, WebDynpro, UI5, and Fiori applications for custom frontend development.

Soft Skills Required :

- Strong problem-solving and troubleshooting skills to handle complex technical issues.

- Excellent communication skills to collaborate effectively with functional teams and business stakeholders.

- Ability to work independently and deliver projects on time in a dynamic environment.

- Documentation skills to create technical specifications, designs, and user manuals for custom developments.

- Team-oriented and flexible with the ability to multitask and manage priorities.

The SAP IS-U Technical Consultant ensures smooth system functionality through custom development, integration, and technical support, contributing to the effective operation of utilities-specific processes in the SAP IS-U environment.
Role: ERP Developer
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Engineering - Software & QA
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Software Development
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. - Bachelor of Technology / Engineering in Any Specialization
PG: Any Postgraduate
Doctorate: Doctorate Not Required
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
data structuresindexingsap istroubleshootingabap
lsmwweb servicessql tuningsap netweaverficabillingtechnical supportidocsuibapialv reportssap hanacrmbdcsap isumaster datawebdynprosapsoftware testingrfcsmartformssap abap

-----------

20.
Job description
ProjectPro365 is looking for Technical Consultant- BC to join our dynamic team and embark on a rewarding career journey
We are seeking a versatile technical consultant to assess and maintain our information technology systems
To ensure success as a technical consultant, you should exhibit extensive experience in providing Information Technology support in a demanding environment
Outstanding technical consultants ensure that company IT systems run efficiently
Documenting processes and monitoring system performance metrics
Implementing the latest technological advancements and solutions
Performing diagnostic tests and troubleshooting
Role: Technical Consultant
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Consulting
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: IT Consulting
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
project managementinformation technologyrbacnetworkingdbmsrecoverytpumpteradata dbasqltechnical consultingtechnical supporttransport managementmicrosoft windowsinstallationsystem performancetroubleshootinguser managementsap hana

-----

21.
Job description
Position is open for domain experts in Oil Gas, Food Qualtiy Assurance and Defense sector.
Minimum 25 year experience is required.
Applicant should be able to drive the business in respective domain.
Role: Technical Consultant
Industry Type: Oil & Gas
Department: Consulting
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: IT Consulting
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Requirement gatheringSolution architectureTechnical analysisClient consultingCustomizationSystem integrationTraining and supportImplementationTechnical documentation



-------------


22.
Job description
5.00 - 15.00 Years
6.00 - 15.00 INR (Lacs)/Yearly
Full-time
Full-time
Roles & Responsibility

Minimum of 4 - 6 years of AX development or relevant experience with deep knowledge of ERP platform in Microsoft Dynamics, web services, security, cloud, and infrastructure.

Proficient in .NET, Visual Studio, C#, X++, SSRS reporting services.

Knowledge on web service integration and AIF.

Understanding on Logic Apps and CDS will be an advantage.

Experience designing custom technical interfaces, modifications, data conversions.

Experience developing custom technical interfaces, modifications, data conversions.

Unit, System, User Acceptance Testing and facilitating of this testing.

Strong technical knowledge of Dynamics 365 for Operations.

Experience with and / or certification for Microsoft Dynamics AX development tools and Application Integration Framework (AIF), EDI XML/BizTalk, SQL Server 2008/2012/2016, Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS), Microsoft SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS), Structured Query Language (SQL).

Requirements

Minimum of 4 - 6 years of AX development or relevant experience with deep knowledge of ERP platform in Microsoft Dynamics, web services, security, cloud, and infrastructure.

Proficient in .NET, Visual Studio, C#, X++, SSRS reporting services.

Knowledge on web service integration and AIF.

Understanding on Logic Apps and CDS will be an advantage.

Experience designing custom technical interfaces, modifications, data conversions.

Experience developing custom technical interfaces, modifications, data conversions.

Unit, System, User Acceptance Testing and facilitating of this testing.

Strong technical knowledge of Dynamics 365 for Operations.

Experience with and / or certification for Microsoft Dynamics AX development tools and Application Integration Framework (AIF), EDI XML/BizTalk, SQL Server 2008/2012/2016, Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS), Microsoft SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS), Structured Query Language (SQL).

Role: Database Developer / Engineer
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Engineering - Software & QA
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: DBA / Data warehousing
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
dynamics axerpcweb servicesmicrosoft dynamicsediintegration frameworksql serversqlcloudreporting servicesoperationsxmlssisdynamics 365


---------------

23.
Job description
Responsibilities A day in the life of an Infoscion • As part of the Infosys delivery team, your primary role would be to interface with the client for quality assurance, issue resolution and ensuring high customer satisfaction. • You will understand requirements, create and review designs, validate the architecture and ensure high levels of service offerings to clients in the technology domain. • You will participate in project estimation, provide inputs for solution delivery, conduct technical risk planning, perform code reviews and unit test plan reviews. • You will lead and guide your teams towards developing optimized high quality code deliverables, continual knowledge management and adherence to the organizational guidelines and processes. • You would be a key contributor to building efficient programs/ systems and if you think you fit right in to help our clients navigate their next in their digital transformation journey, this is the place for you! If you think you fit right in to help our clients navigate their next in their digital transformation journey, this is the place for you! Additional Responsibilities:

Knowledge of more than one technology
Basics of Architecture and Design fundamentals
Knowledge of Testing tools
Knowledge of agile methodologies
Understanding of Project life cycle activities on development and maintenance projects
Understanding of one or more Estimation methodologies, Knowledge of Quality processes
Basics of business domain to understand the business requirements • Analytical abilities, Strong Technical Skills, Good communication skills
Good understanding of the technology and domain
Ability to demonstrate a sound understanding of software quality assurance principles, SOLID design principles and modelling methods
Awareness of latest technologies and trends
Excellent problem solving, analytical and debugging skills
Technical and Professional Requirements:

Primary skills:Domain->Banking->Products
Preferred Skills: Domain->Banking->Products->FICO(SAP)

Role: Technical Consultant
Industry Type: IT Services & Consulting
Department: Consulting
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: IT Consulting
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. - Bachelor of Technology / Engineering in Any Specialization, BCA - Bachelor of Computer Applications in Any Specialization, B.Sc - Bachelor of Science in Any Specialization
PG: MCA in Any Specialization, MS/M.Sc(Science) in Any Specialization, M.Tech in Any Specialization
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
SAP FICO
SAP FICO ImplementationSAP FI/CO

----------

24.

About Workato

Workato transforms technology complexity into business opportunity. As the leader in enterprise orchestration, Workato helps businesses globally streamline operations by connecting data, processes, applications, and experiences. Its AI-powered platform enables teams to navigate complex workflows in real-time, driving efficiency and agility.

Trusted by a community of 400,000 global customers, Workato empowers organizations of every size to unlock new value and lead in today’s fast-changing world. Learn how Workato helps businesses of all sizes achieve more at workato.com.

Why join us?

Ultimately, Workato believes in fostering a flexible, trust-oriented culture that empowers everyone to take full ownership of their roles. We are driven by innovation and looking for team players who want to actively build our company.

But, we also believe in balancing productivity with self-care. That’s why we offer all of our employees a vibrant and dynamic work environment along with a multitude of benefits they can enjoy inside and outside of their work lives.

If this sounds right up your alley, please submit an application. We look forward to getting to know you!

Also, Feel Free To Check Out Why

Business Insider named us an “enterprise startup to bet your career on” 
Forbes’ Cloud 100 recognized us as one of the top 100 private cloud companies in the world 
Deloitte Tech Fast 500 ranked us as the 17th fastest growing tech company in the Bay Area, and 96th in North America 
Quartz ranked us the #1 best company for remote workers 

This role requires working during EMEA working hours (1:30pm-10:30pm IST)

Responsibilities

We are looking for an exceptional Technical Consultant to join our growing team. In this role, you will be responsible for enabling our clients to become proficient on the Workato Platform, empowering their employees and building solutions for their businesses. You will also be responsible to:

Work across multiple customer-facing teams (Sales, Business Development, Product, Engineering, Customer Success) to improve the product's vision and to make global businesses and organizations successful. 
Technical solutions expert with an aptitude for technical advising, troubleshooting, and analysis. With strong communication skills, you will be proficient in communicating technically complex ideas to a non-technical audience. You help Workato employees and customers approach and resolve technical problems and design scalable services. 
Gather requirements via client meetings and lead the solution design process jointly with customers, Business Development and Engineering 
Develop capabilities and features based on customer requirements as well as to extend Workato connector capabilities via HTTP and SDK 
Work closely with Product and Engineering to review customer requirements and feedback, and identify opportunities for Workato platform enhancements 
Accelerate development for roadmap features to address specific customer requirements 
Improve internal processes, and promote knowledge sharing in the team, by contributing to Workato’s knowledge base 
Prioritize and deliver outstanding customer service experience to Workato customers 

Requirements

Qualifications / Experience / Technical Skills

Background in information systems, computing, engineering or equivalent industry experience preferred 
Have 2-4 years of experience in similar role 
Technical background or a good understanding of technology and industry trends, especially in the app integration space 
Working knowledge of APIs (RESTful, etc.) 
Working knowledge of Data Structure (JSON, XML, etc.) 
Working knowledge of any RDBMS 
Previous coding experience/development background required 
Experience working with cloud business apps like Workday / SAP / NetSuite / Salesforce / ServiceNow / Marketo is a plus 

Soft Skills / Personal Characteristics

Strong collaboration skills, ability to adapt to a dynamic start-up environment with a passion for making an impact 
Customer-oriented mindset, easily adaptable to different company sizes and line of business 
Excellent enablement skills, experienced in establishing trust and building partnerships with customers or partners 
Strong critical thinking, analytical skills with an entrepreneurial and proactive mind-set 
Ability to effectively prioritize tasks and manage time, even under high-pressure situations 
Strong written and oral communication skills in English, with the ability to convey complex technical concepts effectively to a non-technical audience 
Fast learner who can independently conduct extensive research, and synthesize ideas, information and options quickly 
Be proactive about solving problems and be ready to take on additional initiatives and responsibilities as they emerge 





------------------------------
1.
About the job
As a Technical Services Consultant, you will have the opportunity to contribute to our ongoing success by delivering high-quality and timely technical implementation support and services that enable Public Financial Management (PFM) reform initiatives for governments around the world.

During the implementation of the FreeBalance Accountability Suite, you will leverage your technical expertise in ERP implementation to design, develop, implement, test, and deploy the FreeBalance Government Resource Planning (GRP) solution. You will collaborate with multiple stakeholders across banks, other government agencies, and financial institutions to design and implement data exchange mechanisms and integrations between systems.

In this role, you will also serve as a Technical Solution Consultant to the in-country project teams, ensuring effective knowledge transfer and adherence to best practices. Additionally, you will work closely with the Sales and Pre-Sales Teams to provide technical insights for existing and prospective customer projects, assist in preparing responses to RFPs, and act as a subject matter expert during technical analysis and specification phases.



Main responsibilities:

Configure and customize web services based on project and system requirements.
Perform web service integration using SOAP and REST standards between FreeBalance GRP and external systems.
Develop, maintain, and optimize BI reports and dashboards using BIRT, and support similar tools such as Jasper Reports, Crystal Reports, Power BI, Pentaho, or Apache BI Suite.
Design and tune ANSI SQL queries to ensure optimal performance and data accuracy across multiple database platforms.
Understand and work with data structures, including data cubes, dimensions, and fact tables, to ensure accurate and efficient reporting.
Support deployment, configuration, and performance optimization of application servers such as Apache Tomcat.
Monitor system performance, troubleshoot technical issues, and implement corrective actions.
Provide technical guidance, training, and post-implementation support to in-country teams and client stakeholders.
Collaborate with internal teams and client representatives to ensure successful delivery of technical solutions aligned with project timelines and quality standards.
English proficiency is required, and knowledge of other languages in addition to the native language is considered an asset


Required Skills and Experience

Proven experience in ERP implementation and system integration using SOAP/REST APIs.
Hands-on experience with BI and dashboard tools, primarily BIRT, and familiarity with JasperReports,Crystal Reports, Power BI, Pentaho, or Apache BI Suite.
Strong knowledge of ANSI SQL, query optimization, and report performance tuning.
Solid understanding of data modeling concepts, including data cubes, dimensions, and fact tables.
Practical experience with web servers such as Apache Tomcat, including deployment and environment configuration.
Good working knowledge of Linux and Windows operating systems.
Experience in ERP environments and public sector or government projects is a plus.


Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or a related field.
Minimum 5 years of professional IT experience, including technical consulting, implementation, or ERP support.
Strong analytical, troubleshooting, and communication skills.
Ability to work effectively with multicultural teams and government clients.
Willingness to travel internationally for project delivery and customer support.


We thank all applicants for their interest; however, only those selected for an interview will be contacted. FreeBalance is an inclusive employer dedicated to building a diverse workforce to increase the representation of the designated groups based on each country’s legislation. We encourage applications from all qualified candidates and will accommodate applicants’ needs under the respective labour law throughout all stages of the recruitment process.

----------------


2. 
About the job
Why Aqovia?

At the Intersection of Innovation and Impact, introducing Aqovia. Aqovia is an international technology firm dedicated to creating tangible value through the power of AI, data-driven, and bespoke software solutions and services.

Our unique approach extends beyond traditional service and solutions delivery, we strategically invest in and nurture a diverse portfolio of promising companies operating across vital sectors including; financial services, health, infrastructure management, sustainability, education, and business intelligence.

This commitment to creating innovation across a broad spectrum allows Aqovia to stay at the cutting edge, delivering transformative solutions and creating significant impact. For our clients and strategic partners, Aqovia offers a unique opportunity to be part of a dynamic and forward-thinking group shaping the future

Role Overview

We are seeking a highly experienced Solutions Architect to lead architecture across complex digital transformation and software development programmes. The role spans consultative pre-sales through post-sales delivery and optimisation, covering cloud, application development, integration, APIs, and modern digital platforms.

A core part of this role is the ability to run effective discovery sessions, uncover client pain points, constraints, and blockers, and translate them into multiple viable solution options that balance technical excellence, delivery feasibility, risk, and commercial considerations.

You will act as a trusted advisor, shaping solutions that are technically robust, pragmatic, and aligned to Agile, Scrum, and DevOps delivery models.

Key Responsibilities:

Discovery, Problem Definition & Solution Shaping

Lead structured discovery sessions and workshops to identify business objectives, user needs, technical pain points, risks, and delivery constraints.
Analyse existing systems, processes, and architectures to uncover challenges, blockers, and improvement opportunities.
Develop multiple solution options and architectural approaches, clearly articulating trade-offs, risks, costs, and benefits.
Guide clients toward the most appropriate solution based on outcomes, not just technology choices.

Consultative Pre-Sales & Bid Support

Lead technical discovery for digital and software transformation initiatives.
Define solution architectures that align business objectives with modern software delivery practices.
Support RFP/RFI and tender responses, including solution designs, delivery approaches, and architectural narratives.
Partner with Sales to present solution options and recommendations to senior business and technical stakeholders.

End-to-End Digital & Software Solution Architecture

Own solution architecture across software development and digital platform projects, including:
Custom application development
API-first and integration-led architectures
Data, analytics, and digital services
Cloud and hybrid environments (AWS, Azure, GCP)
Define architectural standards, principles, and reusable patterns.
Produce architecture artefacts such as HLDs, LLDs, roadmaps, and diagrams.
Ensure non-functional requirements (security, performance, scalability, resilience, compliance) are embedded into designs.

Agile, DevOps & Engineering Alignment

Work closely with delivery teams operating in Agile and Scrum frameworks.
Ensure architectural designs support iterative development, continuous delivery, and rapid feedback loops.
Champion DevOps practices, including CI/CD pipelines, infrastructure-as-code, automated testing, and deployment strategies.
Provide architectural governance that enables speed without compromising quality.

Post-Sales Delivery & Client Engagement

Provide architectural leadership throughout delivery and implementation.
Act as a technical authority and escalation point for software development programmes.
Support clients post-delivery with optimisation, scaling, and roadmap evolution.
Build long-term relationships as a trusted digital and technology advisor.

Thought Leadership & Community Engagement

Facilitate architecture and solution design workshops.
Represent the organisation at industry conferences, client events, and forums.
Contribute to internal capability building, knowledge sharing, and best practices.

Skills & Experience:

Essential

Proven experience as a Solutions Architect delivering digital and software development projects.
Strong experience leading discovery sessions and translating complex pain points into actionable architectures.
Demonstrated ability to design multiple solution options and clearly articulate trade-offs.
Strong practical understanding of Agile, Scrum, and modern SDLCs.
Hands-on experience with DevOps practices, including CI/CD pipelines.
Broad technical background across application development, integration, and cloud platforms.
Experience supporting pre-sales activities, RFPs/RFIs, and client-facing engagements.
Excellent communication skills with both technical and non-technical stakeholders.

Desirable

Consultancy or professional services experience.
Experience working across multi-disciplinary Agile teams (engineering, UX, QA, product).
Familiarity with microservices, containerisation, and modern deployment patterns.
Relevant certifications (Cloud, Agile, DevOps, Architecture).


------------

3. 
In this role, you will:

Take ownership of high-stakes projects, ensuring timely and flawless implementation for top-tier banks. 
Work directly with customers, leading end-to-end delivery of AdalFi’s solutions. 
Be part of a collaborative team driving innovation in financial workflows. Play a critical role in optimizing banking operations, customer experiences, and product delivery. 

Key Responsibilities:

Implementation Leadership: Lead all implementation phases, including pre-UAT, UAT, production deployments, and post-go-live support. 
Customer Engagement: Serve as the primary point of contact for customers, managing expectations and ensuring professional communication throughout the project lifecycle. 
UAT Coordination: Plan, execute, and oversee UAT sessions with banks, resolving issues and ensuring readiness for production. 
Issue Resolution: Proactively track and resolve technical and operational issues, escalating when necessary. 
Process Optimization: Identify inefficiencies in workflows and recommend improvements to enhance delivery. 
Collaboration: Work closely with engineering, QA, and product teams to ensure alignment on deliverables and timelines. 
Mentorship: Provide guidance to junior team members, helping them grow and succeed. 

Required Skills & Experience:

Soft Skills:

Outstanding communication and interpersonal skills to manage client relationships effectively. 
Strong leadership abilities to guide projects and teams. 
Exceptional organizational and multitasking skills to manage multiple projects simultaneously. 
A problem-solving mindset with a focus on delivering results. Hard Skills:
Proven experience in implementing software solutions, especially in banking or financial domains. 
Expertise in UAT processes, system testing, and API integrations. 
Proficiency with tools like JIRA, Confluence, or Asana. 
Advanced technical skills, including SQL, debugging, and understanding of system configurations. 

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field from a reputed university. 
2-4 years of experience in implementation, delivery, or project management roles, preferably in the banking or fintech sector.

---------

4.
About the job
We at Inbox Business Technologies, are seeking a Principal Consultant - ITSM/BCMS, who will be responsible for leading IT Service Management consulting engagements and driving end-to-end ITSM implementation projects for clients across various industries. This role involves managing a team of consultants, delivering high-quality ITSM advisory services, and ensuring alignment with ISO 20000 and ITIL best practices. The ideal candidate will bring extensive implementation experience, strong leadership capabilities, and deep expertise in ITSM frameworks and tools. Also, additionally, having a sound knowledge of ISO 22301 BCMS along with DevSecOps experience would be welcomed.

Responsibilities

Lead and manage ITSM implementation and transformation projects, ensuring project delivery within scope, time, and quality expectations
Oversee development and enhancement of ITSM processes aligned with ISO 20000 and ITIL frameworks
Provide strategic guidance to clients on IT service governance, service delivery optimization, and continuous improvement initiatives
Manage and mentor a team of ITSM consultants, enabling skills development and performance excellence
Conduct gap assessments, maturity evaluations, and process design workshops with client stakeholders
Support presales activities including proposal development, solution presentations, and effort estimation
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to ensure seamless integration with IT operations and governance functions
Ensure compliance and maintain documentation throughout the lifecycle of ITSM engagements
Stay updated on industry trends and advancements in ITSM tools (e.g., Jira, ServiceNow, BMC Remedy, Managed Engine etc.), frameworks, and standards

Requirements

Master's or Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, or IT-related field
ITIL Expert/Managing Professional
ISO 20000 Lead Implementer / Lead Auditor
8 - 10 years of experience in ITSM consulting or related roles
In-depth knowledge of ITIL, ISO 20000, and other relevant frameworks/regulations
Practical experience in ISO 20000 implementation
Familiarity with other IT standards/frameworks such as ISO 27001, ISO 22301, DevSecOps and COBIT, NIST, NCA, SAMA would be an added advantage
Excellent leadership, problem-solving, and decision-making skills
Proven ability to manage multiple projects and clients simultaneously
Experience in conducting internal and external audits related to ITSM would be an added advantage
Strong stakeholder engagement, report writing, and project management skills

------------

5.
About the job
Primary skills:Technology->IOT Platform->AWS IOT

A day in the life of an Infoscion

 As part of the Infosys consulting team, your primary role would be to get to the heart of customer issues, diagnose problem areas, design innovative solutions and facilitate deployment resulting in client delight.
 You will develop a proposal by owning parts of the proposal document and by giving inputs in solution design based on areas of expertise.
 You will plan the activities of configuration, configure the product as per the design, conduct conference room pilots and will assist in resolving any queries related to requirements and solution design
 You will conduct solution/product demonstrations, POC/Proof of Technology workshops and prepare effort estimates which suit the customer budgetary requirements and are in line with organization’s financial guidelines
 Actively lead small projects and contribute to unit-level and organizational initiatives with an objective of providing high quality value adding solutions to customers. If you think you fit right in to help our clients navigate their next in their digital transformation journey, this is the place for you!
 Ability to develop value-creating strategies and models that enable clients to innovate, drive growth and increase their business profitability
 Good knowledge on software configuration management systems
 Awareness of latest technologies and Industry trends
 Logical thinking and problem solving skills along with an ability to collaborate
 Understanding of the financial processes for various types of projects and the various pricing models available
 Ability to assess the current processes, identify improvement areas and suggest the technology solutions
 One or two industry domain knowledge
 Client Interfacing skills
 Project and Team management

-----------------

6.
About the job
Requisition Id: 1680852

As a global leader in assurance, tax, transaction and advisory services, we hire and develop the most passionate people in their field to help build a better working world. This starts with a culture that believes in giving you the training, opportunities and creative freedom. At EY, we don't just focus on who you are now, but who you can become. We believe that it’s your career and ‘It’s yours to build’ which means potential here is limitless and we'll provide you with motivating and fulfilling experiences throughout your career to help you on the path to becoming your best professional self.

The opportunity : Senior Consultant-FS-Tech Consulting-CNS - TC - Technology Strategy & Transformation - Hyderabad

FS : 

Finance fuels our lives. Banking, Insurance and Wealth management, create the foundations for growth, prosperity and peace of mind. No other Industry touches so many people or shapes so many lives.

Amid sweeping regulatory change, today’s financial services institutions are focusing on digital transformation, convergence and disruption from an array of nontraditional competitors — all while meeting greater demands for trust and transparency.

To address this delicate balance of issues, our competent team of business strategists, technologists and industry leaders bring fresh thinking and sector knowledge across banking and capital markets, insurance, and wealth and asset management. The results are seamless collaboration, innovative problem solving, breakthrough performance gains and sustainable value creation.

We recruit, train and nurture a diverse set of people who dedicate their minds to building the future of financial services. Together, we explore new perspectives with innovative and entrepreneurial thinking to deliver exceptional client service and ensure that what we do today, counts for tomorrow.

CNS - TC - Technology Strategy & Transformation : 

EY Consulting is building a better working world by transforming businesses through the power of people, technology and innovation. Our client-centric approach focuses on driving long-term value for our clients by solving their most strategic problems. EY Consulting is made up of three sub-service lines: Business Consulting (including Performance Improvement and Risk Consulting), Technology Consulting and People Advisory Services.

In Tech Consulting, we are transforming businesses through the power of people, technology and innovation. It places humans@center, leverages technology@speed and enables innovation@scale.

Your Key Responsibilities

Technical Excellence

Demonstrated ability to analyze and articulate business needs to drive technology strategy in financial services. Proficient in developing transformation roadmaps that align technology initiatives with organizational goals. Experience in leveraging industry best practices to optimize technology processes and improve operational efficiency. Skilled in assessing current systems and recommending innovative technology solutions that enhance service delivery. Strong capability to conduct comprehensive market research and competitive analysis to support technology decision-making.

Skills And Attributes

To qualify for the role you must have

Qualification

Bachelor of Technology in Computer Science

Experience

5+ years experience

What We Look For

People with the ability to work in a collaborative manner to provide services across multiple client departments while following the commercial and legal requirements. You will need a practical approach to solving issues and complex problems with the ability to deliver insightful and practical solutions. We look for people who are agile, curious, mindful, and able to sustain positive energy, while being adaptable and creative in their approach.




----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 1 :

Role Overview:
We are looking for a transformation expert to lead our legacy modernization initiatives. You will be responsible for conducting a comprehensive current state IT assessment to identify bottlenecks in our application landscape. Your primary goal is to define the target architecture definition that supports our future digital business models.

Key Skills:
Current state IT assessment, Application landscape understanding, Target architecture definition, Legacy system rationalization, Technology risk identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 2 :

- Lead the development of the IT strategy and roadmap for a large financial institution.
- Prioritize technology initiatives based on business value and feasibility.
- Define the technology vision definition for the next 3-5 years.
- Evaluate the risks associated with major technology investments.

Skills:
Technology vision definition, Roadmap sequencing, Initiative prioritization, Feasibility evaluation, Risk evaluation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 3 :

The Opportunity:
You will drive cloud adoption for enterprise clients. This involves evaluating cloud versus on-premise tradeoffs and selecting the right mix of providers (AWS, Azure, GCP). You must provide workload suitability reasoning for moving critical applications to the cloud and ensure clients avoid vendor lock-in risks.

Required Skills:
Cloud adoption approach, Cloud versus on premise tradeoffs, Cloud provider evaluation, Workload suitability reasoning, Vendor lock in risk awareness.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 4 :

- Manage complex ERP modernization programs (SAP/Oracle).
- Develop the logic for CRM transformation to improve customer engagement.
- Rationalize the legacy system portfolio to reduce technical debt.
- Consolidate disparate platforms into a unified ecosystem.

Skills:
ERP modernization logic, CRM transformation logic, Legacy system rationalization, Platform consolidation thinking, Transformation sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 5 :

Scope of Work:
1. Assess the current data architecture and identify gaps.
2. Develop a plan for analytics enablement planning to drive data-driven decision making.
3. Establish data governance alignment to ensure data quality and compliance.
4. Bridge the gap between IT and business stakeholders regarding data strategy.

You need to have:
Data architecture awareness, Analytics enablement planning, Data quality understanding, Data governance alignment, Business IT communication.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 6 :

- Define the security posture for the digital transformation journey.
- Align IT controls with regulatory compliance considerations.
- Establish robust IT governance structures.
- Assess security risks in the new technology landscape.

Skills:
Security risk awareness, Compliance considerations, IT governance understanding, Control alignment thinking, Technology risk identification.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 7 :

- Act as the bridge between the CIO and business unit leaders.
- Manage expectations regarding IT delivery and capabilities.
- Handle issue escalation handling during critical project phases.
- Ensure executive alignment on IT investment priorities.

Skills:
Executive alignment, Business IT communication, Expectation management, Issue escalation handling, Cross functional coordination.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 8 :

- Lead the integration of M&A targets from an IT perspective.
- Assess the interoperability of systems between merging entities.
- Design the integration approach for core applications.
- Evaluate the scalability of the combined infrastructure.

Skills:
Integration approach understanding, Interoperability assessment, Scalability assessment, Infrastructure overview, System dependency analysis.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 9 :

- Manage the delivery of large-scale IT transformation programs.
- Track initiatives and milestones against the roadmap.
- Ensure cross-workstream alignment between infrastructure, apps, and data teams.
- Provide delivery visibility to the steering committee.

Skills:
Initiative tracking, Delivery visibility, Milestone monitoring, Cross workstream alignment, Transformation sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 10 :

- Develop a multi-cloud strategy for a global retailer.
- Compare AWS, Microsoft Azure, and GCP offerings for specific use cases.
- Analyze cost and scalability judgments for cloud workloads.
- Design the target architecture for a cloud-native environment.

Skills:
AWS awareness, Microsoft Azure awareness, GCP awareness, Cost & scalability judgment, Target architecture definition.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 11 :

- Lead the rationalization of the application portfolio.
- Identify system dependencies and risks.
- Develop a roadmap for retiring obsolete systems.
- Ensure the stability of the remaining infrastructure.

Skills:
Application landscape understanding, System dependency analysis, Legacy system rationalization, Roadmap sequencing, Infrastructure overview.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 12 :

- Drive value realization from IT investments.
- Track the benefits of transformation initiatives (cost savings, agility).
- Manage the change and adoption planning for new technology rollouts.
- Coordinate across IT and business functions to ensure successful adoption.

Skills:
Value realization tracking, Change & adoption planning, Cross functional coordination, Transformation sequencing, Executive alignment.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 13 :

- Assess the feasibility of implementing AI/ML solutions.
- Define the data architecture required to support advanced analytics.
- Evaluate the scalability of the infrastructure for big data workloads.
- Prioritize analytics use cases based on business value.

Skills:
Feasibility evaluation, Data architecture awareness, Scalability assessment, Initiative prioritization, Analytics enablement planning.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 14 :

- Design the digital workplace strategy.
- Evaluate collaboration tools and platforms.
- Assess the integration approach with existing enterprise systems.
- Manage the rollout and adoption of new workplace technologies.

Skills:
Technology vision definition, Integration approach understanding, Change & adoption planning, Platform consolidation thinking.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 15 :

- Advise on the selection of cloud providers (DigitalOcean vs. Hyperscalers).
- Evaluate the trade-offs between cost and performance.
- Assess the suitability of workloads for different cloud environments.
- Design the migration roadmap.

Skills:
DigitalOcean awareness, Cloud provider evaluation, Cost & scalability judgment, Workload suitability reasoning, Roadmap sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 16 :

- Strengthen IT governance and control frameworks.
- Align IT processes with industry standards (COBIT, ITIL).
- Ensure compliance with GDPR and other regulations.
- Manage IT risks and audit findings.

Skills:
IT governance understanding, Control alignment thinking, Compliance considerations, Security risk awareness.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 17 :

- Lead the transformation of the finance function's IT systems.
- Modernize the ERP landscape (Oracle/SAP).
- Ensure data quality and consistency across financial systems.
- Manage dependencies with HR and procurement systems.

Skills:
ERP modernization logic, Data quality understanding, System dependency analysis, Cross functional coordination, Dependency management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 18 :

- Develop the customer engagement technology strategy.
- Transform the CRM landscape to support omnichannel experiences.
- Integrate CRM with marketing automation and e-commerce platforms.
- Define the customer data architecture.

Skills:
CRM transformation logic, Integration approach understanding, Data architecture awareness, Technology vision definition.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 19 :

- Conduct a comprehensive infrastructure overview.
- Assess the health and scalability of data centers and networks.
- Develop a roadmap for infrastructure modernization.
- Evaluate the move to Infrastructure-as-Code (IaC).

Skills:
Infrastructure overview, Scalability assessment, Roadmap sequencing, Technology risk identification, Current state IT assessment.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 20 :

- Facilitate the prioritization of the IT project portfolio.
- Align IT initiatives with business strategy.
- Evaluate the feasibility and risk of proposed projects.
- Track portfolio performance and value delivery.

Skills:
Initiative prioritization, Feasibility evaluation, Risk evaluation, Value realization tracking, Alignment with Business Goals.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 21 :

- Manage the relationship between IT and business stakeholders.
- Translate business requirements into technical solutions.
- Communicate technical concepts to non-technical audiences.
- Manage expectations regarding project timelines and scope.

Skills:
Business IT communication, Expectation management, Stakeholder Management, Requirement Understanding.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 22 :

- Lead the modernization of legacy mainframes.
- Develop logic for re-platforming vs. re-factoring.
- Assess the risk of legacy system failure.
- Plan the transition to modern architecture.

Skills:
Legacy system rationalization, Technology risk identification, Transformation sequencing, Target architecture definition.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 23 :

- Develop a roadmap for API-led integration.
- Design the target integration architecture.
- Select the right integration platforms (MuleSoft, Boomi).
- Ensure interoperability between cloud and on-premise systems.

Skills:
Integration approach understanding, Interoperability assessment, Target architecture definition, Cloud versus on premise tradeoffs.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 24 :

- Advise on Oracle Cloud adoption.
- Compare Oracle Cloud with other providers for specific workloads.
- Design the migration strategy for Oracle databases and apps.
- Optimize licensing and costs.

Skills:
Oracle Cloud awareness, Cloud provider evaluation, Cloud adoption approach, Cost & scalability judgment.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 25 :

- Lead the IT workstream for a business divestiture.
- Separate IT systems and infrastructure.
- Manage dependencies and transition service agreements (TSAs).
- Ensure data security during the separation process.

Skills:
System dependency analysis, Dependency management, Security risk awareness, Infrastructure overview, Transformation sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 26 :

- Implement a data lake or data mesh architecture.
- Define data governance roles and responsibilities.
- Ensure data quality for reporting and analytics.
- Select the right data platforms.

Skills:
Data architecture awareness, Data governance alignment, Data quality understanding, Platform consolidation thinking.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 27 :

- Manage the deployment of a new core banking system.
- Track milestones and deliverables.
- Manage cross-workstream dependencies (testing, data migration, integration).
- Report progress to the program board.

Skills:
Milestone monitoring, Delivery visibility, Cross workstream alignment, Dependency management, Transformation sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 28 :

- Advise on IBM Cloud solutions for enterprise clients.
- Assess the fit of IBM Cloud for hybrid cloud scenarios.
- Evaluate the integration with IBM legacy systems (mainframes).
- Design the target hybrid architecture.

Skills:
IBM Cloud awareness, Cloud versus on premise tradeoffs, Workload suitability reasoning, Interoperability assessment.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 29 :

- Develop a strategy for consolidating multiple ERP instances.
- Define the global template and localization strategy.
- Manage the change impact on business processes.
- Ensure executive alignment on the consolidation roadmap.

Skills:
Platform consolidation thinking, ERP modernization logic, Change & adoption planning, Executive alignment.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 30 :

- Assess the current state of IT service management (ITSM).
- Design the future state IT operating model.
- Select and implement ITSM tools (ServiceNow).
- Define IT service catalogs and SLAs.

Skills:
Current state IT assessment, Target architecture definition, Service Delivery (IT Transformation Leadership), Platform consolidation thinking.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 31 :

- Lead the strategy for mobile app development and modernization.
- Assess the current mobile application landscape.
- Define the target mobile architecture.
- Prioritize mobile initiatives based on customer value.

Skills:
Application landscape understanding, Technology vision definition, Initiative prioritization, Target architecture definition.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 32 :

- Develop a cloud exit strategy to avoid vendor lock-in.
- Assess the portability of applications and data.
- Design a multi-cloud or hybrid architecture for flexibility.
- Negotiate contracts to minimize lock-in risks.

Skills:
Vendor lock in risk awareness, Cloud provider evaluation, Interoperability assessment, Risk evaluation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 33 :

- Manage the IT budget and investment planning.
- Evaluate the ROI of technology initiatives.
- Prioritize capital allocation for IT projects.
- Track value realization from IT spend.

Skills:
Initiative prioritization, Value realization tracking, Cost & scalability judgment, Feasibility evaluation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 34 :

- Lead the adoption of DevOps and Agile practices.
- Assess the current software delivery lifecycle.
- Design the toolchain for CI/CD.
- Manage the cultural change required for DevOps.

Skills:
Current state IT assessment, Change & adoption planning, Technology vision definition, Transformation sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 35 :

- Advise on the implementation of robotic process automation (RPA).
- Identify processes suitable for automation.
- Design the RPA architecture and governance.
- Manage the rollout and change management.

Skills:
Feasibility evaluation, Technology vision definition, Governance Structure Design (IT Governance), Change & adoption planning.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 36 :

- Lead the cybersecurity transformation program.
- Assess the maturity of security controls.
- Design the target security architecture (Zero Trust).
- Manage the implementation of security tools.

Skills:
Security risk awareness, Target architecture definition, Control alignment thinking, Transformation sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 37 :

- Develop the strategy for master data management (MDM).
- Assess the quality of master data (customer, product).
- Define data stewardship roles and governance processes.
- Select and implement MDM platforms.

Skills:
Data quality understanding, Data governance alignment, Data architecture awareness, Platform consolidation thinking.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 38 :

- Manage the transition from legacy data centers to the cloud.
- Plan the migration waves and sequencing.
- Assess the risk of downtime during migration.
- Manage dependencies between applications and infrastructure.

Skills:
Roadmap sequencing, Transformation sequencing, Dependency management, Risk evaluation, Cloud adoption approach.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 39 :

- Facilitate workshops to define the future of the IT organization.
- Align IT capabilities with business growth plans.
- Communicate the IT strategy to the board and C-suite.
- Manage stakeholder expectations.

Skills:
Executive alignment, Business IT communication, Technology vision definition, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 40 :

- Lead the assessment of shadow IT within the organization.
- Identify risks associated with unsanctioned technology.
- Develop a governance framework to manage shadow IT.
- Rationalize the toolset and bring systems under IT control.

Skills:
Current state IT assessment, Technology risk identification, IT governance understanding, Application landscape understanding.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 41 :

- Develop a strategy for IoT (Internet of Things) adoption.
- Assess the infrastructure requirements for IoT.
- Define the data architecture for IoT streams.
- Evaluate security risks of connected devices.

Skills:
Technology vision definition, Infrastructure overview, Data architecture awareness, Security risk awareness.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 42 :

- Manage the complexity of a hybrid IT environment.
- Balance workloads between on-premise and cloud.
- Ensure consistent management and security across environments.
- Optimize costs in a hybrid model.

Skills:
Cloud versus on premise tradeoffs, Cost & scalability judgment, Workload suitability reasoning, Hybrid Cloud Strategy (Digital & Cloud Strategy Advisory).

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 43 :

- Lead the rationalization of software licenses and vendors.
- Consolidate redundant applications.
- Negotiate better terms with strategic vendors.
- Reduce the TCO of the software portfolio.

Skills:
Application landscape understanding, Platform consolidation thinking, Cost & scalability judgment, Vendor Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 44 :

- Develop a roadmap for blockchain adoption (if applicable).
- Assess the feasibility of blockchain use cases.
- Design the technical architecture for blockchain solutions.
- Evaluate platform options (Ethereum, Hyperledger).

Skills:
Feasibility evaluation, Target architecture definition, Roadmap sequencing, Technology vision definition.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 45 :

- Lead the IT aspect of regulatory compliance projects (e.g., IFRS 17, Basel).
- Assess the impact of regulations on IT systems.
- Design compliant system architectures.
- Ensure data lineage and traceability.

Skills:
Compliance considerations, System dependency analysis, Target architecture definition, Data quality understanding.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 46 :

- Advise on the use of low-code/no-code platforms.
- Assess the suitability of low-code for different applications.
- Establish governance to prevent sprawl.
- Empower business users while maintaining control.

Skills:
Workload suitability reasoning, IT governance understanding, Platform consolidation thinking, Business IT communication.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 47 :

- Manage the performance of the IT transformation portfolio.
- Identify and resolve cross-project dependencies.
- Ensure resource alignment across initiatives.
- Report on portfolio health to leadership.

Skills:
Cross workstream alignment, Dependency management, Initiative tracking, Delivery visibility.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 48 :

- Develop a strategy for disaster recovery and business continuity.
- Assess the resilience of critical IT systems.
- Design failover mechanisms and redundancy.
- Test recovery plans.

Skills:
Technology risk identification, Infrastructure overview, Resilience Planning (Risk Evaluation), Architecture Design.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 49 :

- Lead the implementation of an enterprise architecture practice.
- Define architecture standards and principles.
- Establish an architecture review board.
- Ensure projects align with the target architecture.

Skills:
Target architecture definition, IT governance understanding, Control alignment thinking, Strategic alignment.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 50 :

- Advise on the modernization of the supply chain IT landscape.
- Integrate logistics, warehousing, and procurement systems.
- Enable real-time visibility through data integration.
- Replace legacy WMS/TMS systems.

Skills:
Legacy system rationalization, Integration approach understanding, System dependency analysis, Cross functional coordination.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 51 :

- Lead the strategy for open source software adoption.
- Assess the risks and benefits of open source.
- Establish policies for open source usage and contribution.
- Manage open source license compliance.

Skills:
Technology risk identification, Compliance considerations, IT governance understanding, Feasibility evaluation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 52 :

- Develop a strategy for edge computing.
- Assess the need for processing data at the edge vs. cloud.
- Design the edge infrastructure architecture.
- Manage the deployment of edge nodes.

Skills:
Infrastructure overview, Target architecture definition, Cloud versus on premise tradeoffs, Workload suitability reasoning.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 53 :

- Manage the human side of IT transformation.
- Assess the impact of new systems on employees.
- Develop training and communication plans.
- Monitor adoption rates and user satisfaction.

Skills:
Change & adoption planning, Stakeholder Management, Business IT communication, Value realization tracking.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 54 :

- Lead the evaluation of SAP S/4HANA migration.
- Assess the business case and roadmap for migration.
- Evaluate greenfield vs. brownfield approaches.
- Manage the technical and functional complexity.

Skills:
ERP modernization logic, Roadmap sequencing, Feasibility evaluation, Transformation sequencing.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 55 :

- Advise on the use of containers and Kubernetes.
- Design the container platform architecture.
- Assess the readiness of applications for containerization.
- Manage the operational shift to microservices.

Skills:
Target architecture definition, Application landscape understanding, Workload suitability reasoning, Infrastructure overview.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 56 :

- Develop a strategy for self-service analytics.
- Enable business users to access and analyze data.
- Establish governance to ensure data consistency.
- Select the right BI tools (Tableau, PowerBI).

Skills:
Analytics enablement planning, Data governance alignment, Business IT communication, Platform consolidation thinking.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 57 :

- Manage the retirement of a legacy mainframe system.
- Archive data and ensure regulatory compliance.
- Manage the transition to the new system.
- Mitigate risks during the decommissioning process.

Skills:
Legacy system rationalization, Data quality understanding, Compliance considerations, Risk evaluation.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 58 :

- Lead the IT integration for a joint venture.
- Establish shared IT services and infrastructure.
- Define the governance model for the JV's IT.
- Manage connectivity and security.

Skills:
IT governance understanding, Infrastructure overview, Integration approach understanding, Stakeholder Management.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 59 :

- Develop a holistic cloud governance framework.
- Manage cloud costs (FinOps).
- Ensure security and compliance in the cloud.
- Standardize cloud provisioning processes.

Skills:
IT governance understanding, Cost & scalability judgment, Security risk awareness, Cloud adoption approach.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 60 :

- Advise on the strategic use of APIs (API Economy).
- Design the API management strategy and platform.
- Enable external partners to integrate via APIs.
- Monetize API assets.

Skills:
Integration approach understanding, Technology vision definition, Target architecture definition, Digital Strategy Advisory.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 61 :

- Lead the modernization of the HRIS landscape (Workday/SuccessFactors).
- Integrate HR systems with payroll and identity management.
- Improve the employee digital experience.
- Ensure data privacy for employee data.

Skills:
System dependency analysis, Integration approach understanding, Data quality understanding, Compliance considerations.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 62 :

- Develop a roadmap for contact center modernization (CCaaS).
- Evaluate cloud-based contact center solutions (AWS Connect, Genesys).
- Integrate with CRM and AI bots.
- Improve agent experience and efficiency.

Skills:
Roadmap sequencing, Cloud provider evaluation, CRM transformation logic, Integration approach understanding.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 63 :

- Assess the technical debt in the application portfolio.
- innovative strategies to pay down technical debt.
- Prioritize refactoring initiatives.
- Communicate the impact of technical debt to business leaders.

Skills:
Application landscape understanding, Technology risk identification, Business IT communication, Initiative prioritization.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 64 :

- Lead the IT strategy for a digital product launch.
- Define the technology stack for the new product.
- Ensure scalability and security from day one.
- Manage the agile delivery process.

Skills:
Technology vision definition, Scalability assessment, Security risk awareness, Cross functional coordination.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------

Job Description 65 :

- Transform the IT operating model from project-based to product-based.
- Define product teams and value streams.
- Align funding models to products.
- Manage the cultural shift.

Skills:
Transformation sequencing, Change & adoption planning, Executive alignment, IT governance understanding.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
